dictsource/kl_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Greenlandic


// don't stress a vowel before these consonant clusters
.L01  ng nng


.group a
        a        a
	a (CC    'a
	a (L01   a

	ak (_	 &g
	ap (_	 &p
	at (_	 &t

	aa	 a:
        aar      a:
	aaq	 a:

	ai (_    aI



.group b
        b        b


.group c
        c        k
        c (e     s
        c (i     s


.group d
        d        d


.group e
        e        E
        e (CC    'E   // a vowel before a consonant cluster is stressed
        e (L01   E    // ... except for these consonants

        ee       E:


.group f
        f        f
        ff       f:


.group g
        g        Q
        gg       x:
        gg (i    C:


.group h
        h         h
        hh        h:


.group i
        i        i
        i (CC    'i
        i (L01   i
        ii       i:


.group j
        j        j
        jj       j:


.group k
        k        k
        kk       k:


.group l
        l        l
        ll       l#


.group m
        m        m
        mm       m:


.group n
        n        n
	na	 na
	naa      na:
        nn       n:
        ng       N
        nng      N:


.group o
        o        o
        o (CC    'o
        o (L01   o
        oo       o:


.group p
        p        p
        pp       p:


.group q
        q        q
        qq       qq


.group r
        r        r
        rr       X:
        rl	 rl#

.group s
        s        s
        ss       s:


.group t
	t        t
	t (i	 ts
     i) t (_     tS;
	tt       t:
	tl       tl#
	ts       ts


.group u
	u        u
	u (CC    'u
	u (L01   u
	uu       u:


.group v
	v        v
	vv       v:


.group w
	w        w


.group x
	x        ks


.group y
	y        j
     K) y (K     i     // not before or after a vowel
     K) y (CC    'i
     K) y (L01   i


.group z
        z        z


.group æ
        æ        &


.group ø
        ø        W


.group å
        å        O


.group
        $        d'olar
